nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Bladeserverbehuizingen: Server bezels en frontplaten; Server brush en blinde panelen; Server rail kit
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Blade-Server-Gehäuse: Server-Blenden und -Frontplatten; Server-Bürsten- und -Blindplatten; Server-Schienensätze
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Chasis para servidores blade: Biseles y placas frontales de servidor; Paneles de cepillo y en blanco para servidor; Kit de riel para servidor
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Kućišta za blade servere: Okviri i prednje ploče za poslužitelje; Četkice i prazne ploče za poslužitelje; Kompleti tračnica za poslužitelje
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > ตู้เบลดเซิร์ฟเวอร์: เบเซลและแผ่นหน้าเซิร์ฟเวอร์; แผงแปรงปิดและแผงปิดช่องเซิร์ฟเวอร์; ชุดราง์เซิร์ฟเวอร์
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Περιβλήματα διακομιστή Blade: Πλαίσια και προσόψεις για διακομιστές; Πάνελ βουρτσών και κενά για διακομιστές; Κιτ ραγών για διακομιστές
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 刀片服务器外壳: 服务器挡板和面板; 服务器刷板和盲板; 服务器导轨套件
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Caixas para servidores blade: Painéis frontais e faceplates para servidor; Painéis de escova e vedação para servidor; Kit de trilhos para servidor
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Кутии за блейд сървъри: Предни панели за сървър; Четки и празни панели за сървър; Релсови комплекти за сървър
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > „Blade“ tipo serverių korpusai: Serverių rėmeliai ir priekinės plokštės; Serverių teptukai ir aklieji skydai; Serverių bėgių rinkiniai
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Boîtiers pour serveurs lames: Façades et panneaux frontaux de serveur; Panneaux passe-câbles et panneaux obturateurs pour serveur; Kit de rails pour serveur
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 刀鋒伺服器機箱: 伺服器擋板與面板; 伺服器刷板與空白面板; 伺服器滑軌組
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Szafy na serwery blade: Maskownice i panele frontowe serwerów; Panele szczotkowe i zaślepki serwerowe; Zestawy szyn serwerowych
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Blase server-rack: Server – bezels og frontplader; Server – polerede og blanke paneler; Server – skinnesæt
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Bladserverskåp: Serverramar och frontpaneler; Serverborst- och blankpaneler; Serverrälskit
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Armários de servidor blade: Painéis frontais e placas para servidor; Painéis de escova e painéis cegos para servidor; Kit de calhas para servidor
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Blade Server Enclosures: Server Bezels & Faceplates; Server Brush & Blank Panels; Server Rail Kits
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 블레이드 서버 인클로저: 서버 베젤 및 페이스플레이트; 서버 브러시 및 블랭크 패널; 서버 레일 키트
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Корзины для блейд-серверов: Лицевые панели и накладки для серверов; Заглушки и щеточные панели для серверов; Комплекты рельсов для серверов
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > ブレードサーバー筐体: サーバー用ベゼル・フェースプレート; サーバー用ブラシパネル・ブランクパネル; サーバーレールキット
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Korttipalvelinkotelot: Palvelinkehykset ja etulevyt; Palvelimen harjapaneelit ja tyhjät paneelit; Palvelinkiskosarjat
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Bladserverkabinetter: Serverbeslag og -frontplater; Serverpensel- og blindpaneler; Serverskinnesett
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Blade szerver házak: Szerverelőlapok és -keretek; Szerverkefe és üres panelek; Szerversínkészletek
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Ohišja za rezinske strežnike: Okvirji in prednje plošče za strežnike; Ščetke in slepe plošče za strežnike; Kompleti tirnic za strežnike
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Thùng máy máy chủ phiến: Viền và mặt trước máy chủ; Bàn chải máy chủ và bảng trống; Bộ kit ray máy chủ
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Carcase pentru servere tip blade: Cadre și plăci frontale pentru servere; Panouri de perii și panouri goale pentru servere; Kituri de șine pentru servere
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Kryty pre kazetový server: Serverové bezely a čelné panely; Serverové kefové a záslepné panely; Serverové montážne súpravy koľajníc
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Skříně pro servery blade: Čelní panely a rámy serverů; Kartáčové a slepé panely serverů; Montážní sady lišt pro servery
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Chassis per blade server: Cornici e frontalini del server; Pannelli a spazzola e vuoti del server; Kit di guide del server
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Blade Sunucu Kasaları: Sunucu Çerçeveleri ve Ön Panelleri; Sunucu Fırça ve Boş Paneller; Sunucu Ray Kitleri